arapaho-2.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [VERB] [II] [IA] [TI] [TA]
[AFFIRMATIVE] [NON_AFFIRMATIVE] [IMPERATIVE] [CONJUNCT] [SUBJUNCTIVE] [ITERATIVE]
[SG] [PL]
[1SG-SUBJ] [2SG-SUBJ] [3SG-SUBJ] [4SG-SUBJ] [1PL-SUBJ] [2PL-SUBJ] [3PL-SUBJ] [4PL-SUBJ] [1PL-EXCL-SUBJ] [1PL-INCL-SUBJ]
[1SG-OBJ] [2SG-OBJ] [3SG-OBJ] [4SG-OBJ] [1PL-OBJ] [2PL-OBJ] [3PL-OBJ] [4PL-OBJ] [1PL-EXCL-OBJ] [1PL-INCL-OBJ]
[3P-OBJ] [4P-OBJ] [3P-SUBJ] [4P-SUBJ] 
[INCL] [EXCL]
[NEG] [PROCLITIC] [IMPERF] [INTERR] [THEME_MARKER]
[PAST] [FUTURE] [INF]
[PRESENT] [PROGRESSIVE] [PERFECTIVE] [IMPERFECTIVE] [SIMPLE]
[PERSON]
[IC]
[LocalAction] [DirectAction] [InverseAction]
[IRREGULAR] [OLD_VERSION]
@U.POS.Verb@
@U.StemType.II@ @U.StemType.AI@ @U.StemType.TI@ @U.StemType.TA@
@U.Order.AFF@ @U.Order.NAFF@ @U.Order.IMP@ @U.Order.CONJ@
@U.TAM.PresPerf@ @U.TAM.PresProg@
@U.TAM.Past@ @U.TAM.Present@ @U.TAM.Future@
@U.TAM.Perfect@ @U.TAM.Prog@
@U.Stem.Initial@ @U.Stem.Final@
@U.IC.Yes@
@U.ActionType.Local@ @U.ActionType.Direct@ @U.ActionType.Inverse@ 
@U.TAM.Perfective@ @U.TAM.Imperfective@ @U.TAM.Simple@
@U.ExceptionAI.Yes@ @U.ExceptionAI.No@


LEXICON Root
@U.POS.Verb@[VERB]:@U.POS.Verb@0     Verb;


LEXICON Verb
                        TAM;


LEXICON TAM
!@U.TAM.Past@[PAST]:@U.TAM.Past@ih^              VerbStem;
@U.TAM.Present@[PRESENT]:@U.TAM.Present@^       VerbStem;
!@U.TAM.Future@[FUT]:@U.TAM.Future@eti^         VerbStem;


!LEXICON Aspect
!@U.TAM.Imperfective@[IMPERFECTIVE]:@U.TAM.Imperfective@ii^      VerbStem;
!@U.TAM.Perfective@[PERFECTIVE]:@U.TAM.Perfective@iis^      VerbStem;
!@U.TAM.Simple@[SIMPLE]:@U.TAM.Simple@0                     VerbStem;


LEXICON VerbStem
!oosoo@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.II@            StemType;
!nihooyoo@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.II@             StemType;
!iisetee@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.II@             StemType;
!tei'eihi@U.Stem.Final@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemType.AI@         StemType;
!beteee@U.Stem.Final@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemType.AI@         StemType;
!bene@U.Stem.Final@@U.ExceptionAI.Yes@@U.StemType.AI@             StemType;
!noohoot@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.TI@               StemType;
!bii'in@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.TI@               StemType;
!nii'eeneet@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.TI@               StemType;
!noohow@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.TA@                 StemType;
cih’oh@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.TA@                 StemType;
!nii’eenew@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.TA@                 StemType;

LEXICON StemType
@U.StemType.II@[II]:@U.StemType.II@0    Order;
@U.StemType.AI@[AI]:@U.StemType.AI@0    Order;
@U.StemType.TI@[TI]:@U.StemType.TI@0    Order;
@U.StemType.TA@[TA]:@U.StemType.TA@0    Order;


LEXICON Order
@U.Order.AFF@[AFFIRMATIVE]:@U.Order.AFF@0       Aff;
!@U.Order.NAFF@[NON_AFFIRMATIVE]:@U.Order.NAFF@0  Naff;
!@U.Order.IMP@[IMPERATIVE]:@U.Order.IMP@0        Imp;
!@U.Order.CONJ@[CONJUNCT]:@U.Order.CONJ@0         Conj;


LEXICON Aff
@U.StemType.II@     IIAff;
@U.StemType.AI@     AIAff;
@U.StemType.TI@     TIAff;
@U.StemType.TA@     TAAff;


LEXICON Naff
@U.StemType.II@     IINaff;
@U.StemType.AI@     AINaff;
@U.StemType.TI@     TINaff;
@U.StemType.TA@     TANaff;


LEXICON Imp
@U.StemType.II@     IIImp;
@U.StemType.AI@     AIImp;
@U.StemType.TI@     TIImp;
@U.StemType.TA@     TAImp;


LEXICON Conj
@U.StemType.II@     IIConj;
@U.StemType.AI@     AIConj;
@U.StemType.TI@     TIConj;
@U.StemType.TA@     TAConj;


LEXICON IIAff
@U.TAM.Present@:@U.TAM.Present@0    ICAff;
@U.TAM.Past@        IIAFFNUM;
@U.TAM.Future@        IIAFFNUM;


!P.477 > include the irregular endings in the lexicon
LEXICON AIAff
@U.TAM.Present@:@U.TAM.Present@0    ICAff;
@U.TAM.Past@        AIAFFPERNUM;
@U.TAM.Future@        AIAFFPERNUM;


LEXICON TIAff
@U.TAM.Present@:@U.TAM.Present@0    ICAff;
@U.TAM.Past@        TIAFFPERNUM;
@U.TAM.Future@        TIAFFPERNUM;


LEXICON TAAff
@U.TAM.Present@:@U.TAM.Present@0    ICAff;
@U.TAM.Past@        TAAFFPERNUM;
@U.TAM.Future@        TAAFFPERNUM;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!Non-Affirmative!!!!!
!LEXICON IINaff
!@U.TAM.Present@:@U.TAM.Present@0    IC;
!@U.TAM.Past@        IINAFFNUM;
!@U.TAM.Future@        IINAFFNUM;


!P.477 > include the irregular endings in the lexicon
!LEXICON AINaff
!@U.TAM.Present@:@U.TAM.Present@0    IC;
!@U.TAM.Past@        AINAFFPERNUM;
!@U.TAM.Future@        AINAFFPERNUM;


!LEXICON TINaff
!@U.TAM.Present@:@U.TAM.Present@0    IC;
!@U.TAM.Past@        TINAFFPERNUM;
!@U.TAM.Future@        TINAFFPERNUM;


!LEXICON TANaff
!@U.TAM.Present@:@U.TAM.Present@0    IC;
!@U.TAM.Past@        TANAFFPERNUM;
!@U.TAM.Future@        TANAFFPERNUM;

!!!!!!

LEXICON ICAff
@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.II@[PERFECT][IC]:@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.II@0      IIAFFNUM;
!@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.II@[PROGRESSIVE][IC]:@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.II@0      IIAFFNUM;
@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.AI@[PERFECT][IC]:@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.AI@0      AIAFFPERNUM;
!@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.AI@[PROGRESSIVE][IC]:@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.AI@0      AIAFFPERNUM;
@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.TI@[PERFECT][IC]:@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.TI@0      TIAFFPERNUM;
!@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.TI@[PROGRESSIVE][IC]:@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.TI@0      TIAFFPERNUM;
@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.TA@[PERFECT][IC]:@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.TA@0      TAAFFPERNUM;
!@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.TA@[PROGRESSIVE][IC]:@U.IC.Yes@@U.StemType.TA@0      TAAFFPERNUM;


LEXICON IIAFFNUM
[3SG-SUBJ]:^'      # ;
[3PL-SUBJ]:^'i     # ;

LEXICON AIAFFPERNUM
[1SG-SUBJ]:^noo   # ;
[1PL-EXCL-SUBJ][OLD_VERSION]:^ni'   # ;
[1PL-EXCL-SUBJ]:^'   # ;
[1PL-INCL-SUBJ]:^no'     # ;
[2SG-SUBJ]:^n     # ;
[2PL-SUBJ]:^nee   # ;
[4SG-SUBJ]:^ni3   # ;
[4PL-SUBJ]:^ni3i  # ;
@U.ExceptionAI.Yes@    AIAFFPERNUMEXCEPTION ;
@U.ExceptionAI.No@     AIAFFPERNUMREGULAR ;

LEXICON AIAFFPERNUMREGULAR
[3SG-SUBJ]:^t     # ;
[3PL-SUBJ]:^3i'    # ;


LEXICON AIAFFPERNUMEXCEPTION
[3SG-SUBJ]:^'     # ;
[3PL-SUBJ]:^'i    # ;


! NUM of OBJ is inflected through reduplication (which is a type of derivation), which I'm not going to cover for now. 
! For [1PL-EXCL-SUBJ], some speakers drop final vowel(s) and consonant of the stem. Some don't. I only generate the one that doesn't drop it.

LEXICON TIAFFPERNUM
[1SG-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^owoo   # ;
[1PL-EXCL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ][OLD_VERSION]:^owu'   # ;
[1PL-EXCL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^owuni'   # ;
[1PL-INCL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^owuno'     # ;
[2SG-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^ow     # ;
[2PL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^owunee   # ;
[3SG-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^o'     # ;
[3PL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^ou'u    # ;
[4SG-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^owuni3   # ;
[4PL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^owuni3i  # ;


LEXICON TAAFFPERNUM
@U.ActionType.Local@[LocalAction]:@U.ActionType.Local@0     TAAffLocal;
@U.ActionType.Direct@[DirectAction]:@U.ActionType.Direct@0     TAAffDirect;
@U.ActionType.Inverse@[InverseAction]:@U.ActionType.Inverse@0     TAAffInverse;


LEXICON TAAffLocal
[1SG-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:^e3en   # ;
[1SG-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:^e3enee   # ;
[2SG-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:^in   # ;
[2PL-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:^inee   # ;
[1PL-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:^een   # ;
[1PL-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:^eenee   # ;
[2SG-SUBJ][1PL-OBJ]:^ei'een   # ;
[2PL-SUBJ][1PL-OBJ]:^ei'eenee   # ;


LEXICON TAAffDirect
[1SG-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^o'   # ;
[1SG-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^ou'u   # ;
[2SG-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^ot   # ;
[2SG-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^oti   # ;
[3SG-SUBJ][4P-OBJ]:^oot   # ;
[4SG-SUBJ][4P-OBJ]:^ooni3   # ;
[1PL-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^eet   # ;
[1PL-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^ee3i'   # ;
[1PL-INCL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^oono'   # ;
[2PL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:^oonee   # ;
[3PL-SUBJ][4P-OBJ]:^oo3i'   # ;
[4PL-SUBJ][4P-OBJ]:^ooni3i   # ;


LEXICON TAAffInverse
[3SG-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:^einoo   # ;
[3PL-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:^i3i'   # ;
[3SG-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:^ein   # ;
[3PL-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:^einoni   # ;
[4P-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:^eit   # ;
[4P-SUBJ][4SG-OBJ]:^eini3   # ;
[3SG-SUBJ][1PL-OBJ]:^ei'eet   # ;
[3PL-SUBJ][1PL-OBJ]:^ei'ee3i'   # ;
[3P-SUBJ][1PL-INCL-OBJ]:^eino'   # ;
[3P-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:^einee   # ;
[4P-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:^ei3i'   # ;
[4P-SUBJ][4PL-OBJ]:^eini3i   # ;

!LEXICON IINAFFNUM
![3SG-SUBJ]:^      # ;
![3PL-SUBJ]:^no     # ;


!LEXICON AINAFFPERNUM
![1SG-SUBJ]:^ne   # ;
![1PL-EXCL-SUBJ]:^'   # ;
![1PL-EXCL-SUBJ]:^ni'   # ;
![1PL-INCL-SUBJ]:^no'     # ;
![2SG-SUBJ]:^n     # ;
![2PL-SUBJ]:^nee   # ;
![3SG-SUBJ]:^t     # ;
![3SG-SUBJ]:^'     # ;
![3PL-SUBJ]:^3i'    # ;
![3PL-SUBJ]:^'i    # ;
![4SG-SUBJ]:^ni3   # ;
![4PL-SUBJ]:^ni3i  # ;


!LEXICON TINAFFPERNUM


!LEXICON TANAFFPERNUM
!@U.ActionType.Local@[LocalAction]:@U.ActionType.Local@0     TANaffLocal;
!@U.ActionType.Direct@[DirectAction]:@U.ActionType.Direct@0     TANaffDirect;
!@U.ActionType.Inverse@[InverseAction]:@U.ActionType.Inverse@0     TANaffInverse;

!LEXICON TANaffLocal

!LEXICON TANaffDirect

!LEXICON TANaffInverse
